North Dakota, session 69, HB1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 12-63 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Peace officer - Requirement - Report to United States immigration and customs
enforcement.
If a peace officer employed by a criminal justice agency or a political subdivision has
probable cause to believe an immigrant is in the United States illegally, the officer shall report
the immigrant to United States immigration and customs enforcement or United States customs
and border protection.
Page No. 1 25.0127.02000